nl: Grading schaal: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Anders
nb: Graderingsskala: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Annet
pt-BR: Escala de classificação: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Espécime); Sheldon (1-70); Outro
zh-CN: 分级标准: 精制 (PR/PF); SP (样币); Sheldon (1–70); 其他
fi: Arviointiasteikko: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Muu
es: Escala de calificación: Proof (PR/PF); SP (espécimen); Sheldon (1-70); Otra
hu: Minősítési skála: Tükörveret (PR/PF); SP (Mintaveret); Sheldon (1–70); Egyéb
de: Bewertungsskala: Polierte Platte (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Andere
sk-SK: Stupnica klasifikácie: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1 – 70); Iné
it: Scala di valutazione: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Altro
sv: Betygsskala: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Annan
sl-SI: Lestvica ocenjevanja: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldonova lestvica (1–70); Drugo
th: การให้คะแนนขยายสเกล: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); อื่นๆ
pl: Skala klasyfikacji: Lustrzanka (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Skala Sheldona (1–70); Inna
pt-PT: Expansão de classificação: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Espécime); Sheldon (1-70); Outro
bg-BG: Скала за оценяване: Пруф (PR/PF); SP (Спесимен); Скала на Шелдън (1–70); Друго
hr-HR: Ljestvica ocjenjivanja: Polirana ploča (PR/PF); SP (uzorak); Sheldon (1 – 70); Ostalo
lt-LT: Vertinimo skalė: Proof (PR / PF); SP (pavyzdys); Šeldono (1–70); Kita
tr: Derecelendirme ölçeği: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Örnek); Sheldon (1-70); Diğer
fr: Échelle de notation: Épreuve (PR/PF); SP (Spécimen); Sheldon (1 à 70); Autre
ru: Шкала оценки: Пруф (PR/PF); SP (образец); Шкала Шелдона (1–70); Другое
vi: Thang điểm: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Mẫu vật); Sheldon (1–70); Khác
da: Graderingsskala: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1-70); Anden
ja: グレーディングスケール: プルーフ (PR/PF); SP (見本); シェルドン・スケール (1～70); その他
zh-TW: 分級量表: 精鑄 (PR/PF); 樣幣 (SP); Sheldon 等級 (1–70); 其他
en: Grading scale: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Other
el: Κλίμακα βαθμολόγησης: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Δοκίμιο); Sheldon (1-70); Άλλο
cs: Hodnoticí škála: Proof (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldonova stupnice (1–70); Ostatní
ro-RO: Scală de notare: Dovadă (PR/PF); SP (Specimen); Sheldon (1–70); Altele
ko: 등급 표기 체계: 프루프(PR/PF); SP(견본); 쉘던(1~70); 기타